Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

28-1-1.
Membership and apportionment of General Assembly.

There shall be 180 members of the House of Representatives, and such membership shall be apportioned among the representative districts provided for in Chapter 2 of this title.

There shall be 56 members of the Senate, and such membership shall be apportioned among the senatorial districts provided for in Chapter 2 of this title.

Click to view

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 192, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 291; Ga. L. 1901, p. 51, § 1; Ga. L. 1906, p. 80, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 333, 334; Ga. L. 1918, p. 84, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1921, p. 229, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 48, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 47-101, 47-102; Ga. L. 1946, p. 42, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, Ex. Sess., p. 7, § 9; Ga. L. 1965, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 159, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 187, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 22, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 69, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 16, § 1.

Cross references.

Composition and apportionment of General Assembly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Paras. I and II.

Editor’s notes.

Prior to the legislative session of 1890-91, the provisions of law relating to the composition of the General Assembly were solely constitutional provisions, which were codified as follows:

Senate

Code 1863, § 4923

Code 1868, § 4917

Code 1873, § 5042

Code 1882, § 5040

House of Representatives

Code 1863, § 4927

Code 1868, § 4921

Code 1873, § 5046

Code 1882, § 5042

In the session of 1890-91, the first nonconstitutional provision relating to the composition of the House of Representatives was enacted by Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 192, § l, which was subsequently codified as § 291 of the Civil Code of 1895. In the session of 1906, the first nonconstitutional provision relating to the composition of the Senate was enacted by Ga. L. 1906, p. 80, § 1, which was subsequently codified as § 334 of the Civil Code of 1910.

As a result of the enactment of the nonconstitutional provisions, there appeared in the Code beginning with the Code of 1895 parallel constitutional and nonconstitutional provisions relating to the composition of the General Assembly, which were codified as follows: Senate Civil Code 1910
§ 6411 (Const.)
§ 344 Code 1933
§ 2-1301 (1877 Const.)
§ 2-1401 (1945 Const.)
§ 2-801 (1976 Const.)
§ 47-102 House of Representatives Civil Code 1895
§ 5747 (Const.)
§ 291 Civil Code 1910
§ 6413 (Const.)
§ 333 Code 1933
§ 2-1401 (1877 Const.)
§ 2-1501 (1945 Const.)
§ 2-901 (1976 Const.)
§ 47-101

28-1-2.
Time and place of meetings.

The meetings of the General Assembly shall be held as prescribed in Article III, Section IV, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia. The Senate shall convene daily at 10:00 A.M. unless otherwise ordered by the Senate. The House shall convene daily at 10:00 A.M. unless otherwise ordered by the House. The General Assembly shall meet at the state capitol.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 258, § 1; Code 1863, § 172; Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 30, § 1; Code 1868, § 167; Ga. L. 1870, p. 419, § 1; Code 1873, § 178; Code 1882, § 178; Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 55, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 289; Ga. L. 1902, p. 66, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1910, § 331; Ga. L. 1924, p. 31, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1931, p. 1053; Code 1933, § 47-103; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 54; Ga. L. 1984, p. 602, § 1.

Cross references.

Convening of special sessions of General Assembly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. II, Para. VII.

28-1-3.
Initial organization.

The Senate and the House of Representatives shall be organized by the Secretary of the Senate or the Clerk of the House of Representatives who shall be ex officio presiding officer until a presiding officer is elected. No question except one relating to the organization shall be entertained by such officer; and, in deciding such question, he shall be governed, as far as practicable, by the standing rules of the house over which he presides. In the absence of such officer, his assistant may officiate. In the absence of both, the body may appoint a chairman whose powers and duties shall be the same as those of the Secretary or Clerk.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 174; Code 1868, § 169; Code 1873, § 180; Code 1882, § 180; Civil Code 1895, § 292; Civil Code 1910, § 335; Code 1933, § 47-104.

28-1-4.
Form and administration of oath of office to members.

In addition to any other oath prescribed by law, each Senator and Representative, before taking the seat to which elected, shall take the following oath:

“I do hereby solemnly swear or affirm that I will support the Constitution of this state and of the United States and, on all questions and measures which may come before me, I will so conduct myself, as will, in my judgment, be most conducive to the interests and prosperity of this state.”

The oath of office prescribed by subsection (a) of this Code section may be administered to the members of the General Assembly by any Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, judge of the superior courts, or judge of the state courts. Such Justice or judge shall be procured by the person organizing each branch.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 175; Code 1868, § 170; Code 1873, § 181; Code 1882, § 181; Civil Code 1895, § 293; Civil Code 1910, § 336; Code 1933, § 47-105; Ga. L. 1945, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 936, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 746, § 1.

Cross references.

Oath of General Assembly members, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IV, Para. II.

Enumeration of oaths required for holders of public office, § 45-3-1.

Loyalty oath, § 45-3-11 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 936, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of this Act to implement the provisions of Article III, Section IV, Paragraph II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

28-1-5.
Commission of members.

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to prepare and furnish to each member of the General Assembly, after the member has taken his oath of office, a commission under the signature of the Secretary of State, containing the great seal of the state, showing that the member is a duly elected member of the General Assembly of Georgia, and showing any prior serving in either house of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 480, § 1.

28-1-6.
Powers and duties of President Pro Tempore of the Senate and Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives.

While presiding or in the absence of the President of the Senate, the President Pro Tempore shall have the same powers and duties as the President of the Senate. While presiding or in the absence of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Speaker Pro Tempore shall have the same powers and duties as the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 176; Code 1868, § 171; Code 1873, § 182; Code 1882, § 182; Civil Code 1895, § 294; Civil Code 1910, § 337; Code 1933, § 47-106; Ga. L. 1983, p. 689, § 2.

Cross references.

President Pro Tempore of the Senate, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. III, Para. I.

Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. III, Para. II.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 689, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of this Act to implement the provisions of Article III, Section III of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

28-1-6.1.
Method for determining permanent disability of Speaker of the House of Representatives.

Upon a petition of 20 members of the majority caucus of the House of Representatives being filed with the Clerk of the House that the Speaker of the House is unable to perform the duties of that office because of physical or mental disability, the Clerk shall make a copy of the petition for the records of his office and shall transmit, within three days, the original to the chairman of the majority caucus along with his certificate as to the date and time on which the petition was filed with him. The chairman shall call a meeting of the caucus to be held within five days from the date he receives the petition and certificate from the Clerk. Such meeting shall be for the purpose of holding a hearing on the petition and the caucus shall adopt rules for the conduct of the hearing. After the hearing the members of the caucus shall vote and if a majority of the membership of the caucus votes that there is a disability and that such disability is permanent the office shall be declared vacant and the Speaker Pro Tempore shall become Speaker and serve until a Speaker is elected.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-1-6.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 681, § 2.

Cross references.

Assumption of duties by Speaker Pro Tempore upon Speaker’s disability, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. III, Para. II.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 681, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article III, Section III, Paragraph II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

28-1-7.
Failure of officer to organize emergency session.

If any officer of either branch of the General Assembly shall fail or refuse to perform any of his duties in completing the organization of an emergency session, as provided for in Article V, Section II, Paragraph VII(b) of the Constitution of Georgia, his office may, upon the majority vote of the membership of the branch, be declared vacant, as often as may be necessary, and his successor elected as provided by the rules of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 190, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 54.

Cross references.

Expulsion of members generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IV, Para. VII.

28-1-8.
Salary and allowances of members and officers.

Each member of the General Assembly shall receive an annual salary, as provided for in Code Section 45-7-4, to be paid in equal monthly installments. Upon complying with the requirements of paragraph (22) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-7-4, each member shall also be reimbursed for those actual expenses incurred in the performance of duties for which reimbursement is provided in paragraph (22) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-7-4. The Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall receive an additional amount per annum as provided for in Code Section 45-7-4. The majority leader, the minority leader, the administration floor leader, and the assistant administration floor leaders of the House of Representatives and the majority leader, the minority leader, the administration floor leader, and the assistant administration floor leaders of the Senate shall each receive such additional amount per annum as shall be provided by resolution of the respective houses; but such amount for each shall not be greater than the additional amount provided by law for the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives. All of such additional amounts shall also be paid in equal monthly installments.

During regular and extraordinary sessions of the General Assembly, each member shall also receive a daily expense allowance. Each member shall also receive the mileage allowance for the use of a personal car when devoted to official business as provided for in Code Section 50-19-7, for not more than one round trip to and from the member’s residence and the state capitol by the most practical route, per calendar week, or portion thereof, during each regular and extraordinary session. In the event a member travels by public carrier for any part of a round trip as provided above, such member shall receive a travel allowance of actual transportation costs for each such part in lieu of the mileage allowance. For each day’s service within the state as a member of a standing committee or of an interim committee created by or pursuant to a resolution of either or both houses or as a member of a committee, board, bureau, commission, or other agency created by or pursuant to statute or the Constitution of Georgia, such member shall receive a daily expense allowance and the mileage allowance for the use of a personal car when devoted to official business as provided for in Code Section 50-19-7 or a travel allowance of actual transportation costs if traveling by public carrier. Any such member shall also be reimbursed for any conference or meeting registration fee incurred in the performance of his or her official duties as a member of any committee, board, bureau, commission, or other agency. In the event it becomes necessary for a committee to rent a meeting room in the performance of the duties of the committee, the committee chairperson must have prior written approval of the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the House, or both, as the case may be, depending on the composition of the committee. The expense of such rental shall be billed to the committee. For each day’s service out of state as a member of any committee, board, bureau, commission, or other agency, such member shall receive actual expenses as an expense allowance, plus the mileage allowance for the use of a personal car when devoted to official business as provided for in Code Section 50-19-7 or a travel allowance of actual transportation costs if traveling by public carrier or by rental motor vehicle. The amount of the daily expense allowances provided for in this paragraph shall be fixed by the Legislative Services Committee; provided, however, that the amount of the daily expense allowance shall remain at $75.00 until changed by the Legislative Services Committee. The Legislative Services Committee shall periodically review, and when appropriate revise, the amount of the daily expense allowance. The amount of the daily expense allowance shall be fixed by the Legislative Services Committee in an amount which reasonably corresponds to the housing and meal expenses typically incurred by members in the performance of their duties; provided, however, that the amount so fixed shall not exceed the federal per diem rate in effect for the state capital as specified by the General Services Administration at the time that the committee acts.

Transportation costs incurred by a member of the Senate for air travel within or without the state during the interim as a member of a committee, board, bureau, commission, or other agency shall be reimbursed only if the incurring of such costs is approved under procedures established by the Senate Administrative Affairs Committee. Transportation costs incurred by a member of the House of Representatives for air travel within or without the state during the interim as a member of a committee, board, bureau, commission, or other agency shall be reimbursed only if the incurring of such costs is approved under procedures established by the Speaker of the House.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection to the contrary, reimbursement of authorized transportation costs incurred by a member of the General Assembly for air travel inside or outside the state at any time shall be limited to the amounts provided for in the state-wide contract. As used in this paragraph, the term “state-wide contract” means the state-wide contract for airline travel incorporated in the state travel regulations established by the State Accounting Office. This limitation shall not apply, however, if the air travel is between pairs of cities not covered in the state-wide contract, if no state-wide contract is in effect, if the contracted flight is other than a nonstop flight, the contracted flight would cause the member undue hardship or would conflict with the member’s schedule, or if passage under a state-wide contract is otherwise not reasonably available. When reimbursement is requested for an amount in excess of the amount provided in the state-wide contract, the member shall sign a statement indicating which of the foregoing exceptions applies.

All allowances provided for in this subsection shall be paid upon the submission of proper vouchers.

No member shall receive any expense allowance, mileage allowance, or travel allowance for service as a member of any committee, board, bureau, commission, or other agency, as provided for in this Code section, unless such member has personally performed the service and has personally incurred the expense for mileage or travel. Each member of the General Assembly submitting a voucher shall certify that such member personally performed the service and personally incurred the expense for mileage or travel covered by the voucher and that the information contained on the voucher is true and correct. The voucher shall contain such a certificate which the member must sign.

It shall be unlawful for any member willfully to make a certificate, as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section, knowing it to be false; and any member convicted of making such a false certificate shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or by imprisonment of not less than one nor more than five years, or both. No member of the General Assembly shall receive any compensation, salary, per diem, expenses, allowances, mileage, costs, or any other remuneration whatsoever for service as a member of the General Assembly other than as provided for in this Code section.

The Senate Rules Committee shall designate an audit subcommittee to examine and review, not less than once every two months, legislative expenditures, including all vouchers submitted by members of the Senate, as provided for in this Code section, for which the members have received payment. The subcommittee is authorized to issue reports of its examination and review. The House Information and Audits Committee shall examine and review, not less than once every two months, legislative expenditures, including all vouchers submitted by members of the House of Representatives, as provided for in this Code section, for which the members have received payment. The committee is authorized to issue reports of its examination and review.

If sickness prevents any member from attending the house of which he or she is a member during any session of the General Assembly, he or she shall be entitled to the same daily expense allowance as an attending member. No member shall receive a daily expense allowance for absent time except on account of sickness of himself or herself or his or her family or by express leave of the house of which he or she is a member.

Prior to January 10, 1983, if any member of the General Assembly dies during or after a regular or extraordinary session without having received all or any portion of his or her daily expense allowance for such session, the amount due for the whole session shall be paid to the surviving spouse of the deceased; and if there is no surviving spouse, in like manner to the children; and if there are no children, in like manner to the mother; and if there is no mother, in like manner to the father; and if there is no father, in like manner to the estate of the deceased member.

From and after January 10, 1983, if any member of the General Assembly dies during or after a regular or extraordinary session without having received all or any portion of the member’s daily expense allowance for such session, the amount due for the whole session shall be paid to the surviving spouse of the deceased; and if there is no surviving spouse, in like manner to the children; and if there are no children, in like manner to the estate of the deceased member. The member’s salary for the full calendar month during which the member dies shall be paid in the same manner.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 184, 185, 186; Code 1868, §§ 178, 179, 180; Ga. L. 1871-72, p. 18, § 1; Code 1873, §§ 189, 190, 191; Code 1882, §§ 189, 190, 191; Civil Code 1895, §§ 309, 310, 311; Civil Code 1910, §§ 351, 352, 353; Ga. L. 1918, p. 89, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 76, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 47-107, 47-108, 47-109; Ga. L. 1960, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 544, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 39, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 647, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 207, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 248, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 155, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 763, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 699, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 28; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1055, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 28; Ga. L. 1986, p. 311, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 314, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3041, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1302, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1242, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 865, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 30/HB 293; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 17/HB 117; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 28/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, in subsection (f), substituted “he or she” for “he” throughout and substituted “himself or herself or his or her family” for “himself or his family” near the end; and substituted “his or her” for “his” near the beginning of subsection (g).

Cross references.

Salaries generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art III, Sec. IV, Para. VI.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “nonstop” was substituted for “non-stop” near the middle of the third sentence of paragraph (b)(3).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, Code Section 28-1-8, as enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 620, § 7, was redesignated as Code Section 28-1-8.1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 699, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that Section 1 of that Act, regarding payment of salary and expense allowance of a member who has died, shall become effective when members of the General Assembly take office on the convening day of the regular session in 1983.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 1302, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amount of daily expense allowance shall remain $59.00 until the convening date of the 1997 regular session of the General Assembly and that on and after such date the allowance shall be $75.00.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

28-1-8.1.
Failure of members to file state income tax returns.

The state revenue commissioner shall be required to report to the chairperson of the Senate Ethics Committee the name of any Senator who has not filed a Georgia personal income tax return required by law to be filed by the Senator or is a defaulter for state income taxes in violation of Article II, Section II, Paragraph III of the Constitution. The state revenue commissioner shall be required to report to the chairperson of the House Committee on Ethics the name of any Representative who has not filed a Georgia personal income tax return required by law to be filed by the Representative or is a defaulter for state income taxes in violation of Article II, Section II, Paragraph III of the Constitution.

The state revenue commissioner shall give written notice by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or statutory overnight delivery of any report under this Code section to the member of the General Assembly who is to be named at least 30 days prior to making such report.

Upon receipt of a report under this Code section, the chairperson of the committee to whom the report is made shall undertake an appropriate investigation of the matter and report the findings of the investigation to the presiding officer of his or her chamber.

Nothing in this Code section shall apply with respect to a tax return for which the taxpayer has timely applied for and received an unexpired extension of time to file.

The provisions of this Code section shall control over the provisions of Code Section 48-7-60 or any other law relating to confidential treatment of state income tax return information.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-1-8.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 620, § 7/SB 168.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, Code Section 28-1-8, as enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 620, § 7, was redesignated as Code Section 28-1-8.1.

28-1-9.
Service in General Assembly to be credited to pension plan of employee of political subdivision.

Any person employed by any political subdivision or elected to an office therein on or after March 6, 1962, who, by reason of such office or employment, is eligible for pension benefits under any local system and who, prior to such employment, was a member of the General Assembly of Georgia shall receive credit for time served in the General Assembly in the computation of the service required to become eligible to retire and receive a pension. In computing such credit, such person shall be credited for a full year for each year’s membership in the General Assembly of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 595, § 1.

Cross references.

Restrictions on crediting of time served in General Assembly to creditable service under local retirement or pension system, §

47-1-8

.

28-1-10.
Seals of the General Assembly and of each house.

Authority is granted for the General Assembly, the House of Representatives, and the Senate each to have a seal. The Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House, the Secretary of the Senate, and the Clerk of the House are authorized to use the seal of the General Assembly. The Lieutenant Governor and the Secretary of the Senate are authorized to use the seal of the Senate. The Speaker of the House and the Clerk of the House are authorized to use the seal of the House of Representatives. The Secretary of State is authorized and directed to provide three seals of the General Assembly, placing one in the custody of the Secretary of the Senate, placing one in the custody of the Clerk of the House, and retaining custody of one. He shall provide two seals of the Senate, placing one in the custody of the Secretary of the Senate and retaining custody of one. He shall provide two seals of the House of Representatives, placing one in the custody of the Clerk of the House and retaining custody of one.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 17.

Cross references.

Great seal of the state, §§

50-3-30

,

50-3-31

.

28-1-11.
Maintenance of engrossed and enrolled bills and resolutions; Secretary of State to publish enrolled Acts.

The engrossed copies of all bills and of all resolutions intended to have the effect of law passed by either house of the General Assembly shall be preserved by the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives and deposited in the office of the Secretary of State. The enrolled copies of all bills and of all resolutions intended to have the effect of law, which, when signed by the Governor, become enrolled Acts, shall be deposited in the office of the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall provide for the publication of such Acts.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 182; Code 1868, § 177; Code 1873, § 188; Code 1882, § 188; Civil Code 1895, § 308; Civil Code 1910, § 350; Code 1933, § 47-901; Ga. L. 1983, p. 688, § 2.

Cross references.

Preservation of journals and publication of laws, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. V, Para. I.

Duty of Secretary of State to provide local Acts or general Acts of local application to election superintendent and governing authority, § 45-13-24.

State records management, §

50-18-90

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 688, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly,
provides: “It is the intent of this Act to implement the provisions of Article III, Section V, Paragraph I of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

28-1-12.
Election of state officers for whom manner and time of election not provided.

Every state officer whose election is not otherwise provided for shall be elected by the General Assembly in the same manner and at the same time as other officers are elected by the General Assembly.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1284; Code 1868, § 1365; Code 1873, § 1340; Code 1882, § 1340; Civil Code 1895, § 329; Civil Code 1910, § 372; Code 1933, § 47-401.

Cross references.

Open Meetings of General Assembly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IV, Para. XI.

Election by Senate and House of Representatives of elector members of State Election Board, §

21-2-30

.

28-1-13.
Eligibility of elected county or municipal officials for membership in General Assembly.

No elected county or municipal official shall be eligible to serve as a member of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 683, § 1.

28-1-14.
Notice of intention to introduce local bill; copies to governing authorities.

No local bill shall become law unless notice of the intention to introduce such bill shall have been advertised in the newspaper in which the sheriff’s advertisements for the locality affected are published one time before the bill is introduced. Such advertisement must be not more than 60 days prior to the convening date of the session at which the bill is introduced. After the advertisement has been published the bill may be introduced at any time during that session unless the advertisement is published during the session, in which event the bill may not be introduced before Monday of the calendar week following the week in which the advertisement is published.

No local bill amending the charter of a municipality or the enabling Act of the governing authority of a county or a consolidated government shall become law unless a copy of the notice of the intention to introduce local legislation required by subsection (a) of this Code section is mailed, transmitted by facsimile, or otherwise provided to the governing authority of any county, municipality, or consolidated government referred to in the bill during the calendar week in which such notice is published as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section or during the seven days immediately following the date of publication of such notice. A single notice sent by United States mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the governing authority of the county, municipality, or consolidated government at the official address of such governing authority shall satisfy the requirement of this subsection. If such notice is mailed, the notice requirement of this subsection shall be presumed to have been met by depositing the copy of the required notice in the United States mail. For purposes of this subsection, the copy of the notice provided to such governing authority may consist of an actual or photostatic copy of the published notice or a typed restatement of the contents of such notice.

A copy of the notice as it was advertised and an affidavit stating that the notice has been published as provided by this Code section and that the notice requirements of this Code section have been met shall be attached to the bill and shall become a part of the bill. Such affidavit shall be made by the author of the bill.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-1-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 646, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 747, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1198, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 11, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 985, § 1.

Cross references.

Advertisement of notice to introduce local legislation, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. V, Para. IX.

Advertisement of local legislation proposing salary supplement for judges, §

15-6-29

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 646, § 2 and Ga. L. 1983, p. 1205, § 2, both enacted Code sections designated as “28-1-14.” The “28-1-14” enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1205, § 2 was redesignated as “28-1-15” by Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 28.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 646, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intent of this Act to provide the law required by Article III, Section V, Paragraph IX of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

Ga. L. 1991, p. 747, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“This Act shall become effective July 1, 1991, and shall apply with respect to bills introduced at sessions of the General Assembly convening on or after that date.
Any bill introduced at any prior session of the General Assembly shall be subject to prior law, notwithstanding the fact that it may be carried over to a later session of the General Assembly.”